Louisiana, session 2026, HB808.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:43.5 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§43.5. Intentional exposure to HIV
A. No person shall intentionally expose another person to the human
immunodeficiency virus (HIV) through without the knowing and lawful consent of
the victim when the offender knew that he was positive for HIV at the time of the
exposure and the contact posed a substantial likelihood of transmission as follows:
(1) Through sexual contact.
(2) Through the sharing of hypodermic needles or syringes without the
knowing and lawful consent of the victim, if at the time of the exposure the infected
person knew he was HIV positive.
B. (3) No person shall intentionally expose another to HIV through Through
any means or contact without the knowing and lawful consent of the victim, if at the
time of the exposure the infected person knew he was HIV positive that poses a
substantial likelihood of transmission.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 808 ENROLLED
C. (4) No person shall intentionally expose a first responder to HIV through
Through any means or contact without the knowing and lawful consent of the first
responder when that poses a substantial likelihood of transmission if the offender
knows at the time of the offense that he is HIV positive, and has reasonable grounds
to believe the victim is a first responder acting in the performance of his duty official
duties.
D. B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the
following meanings:
(1) "first First responder" includes a any of the following:
(a) A commissioned police officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, deputy
marshal, correctional officer, constable, wildlife enforcement agent, and or probation
and parole officer, any.
(b) Any licensed emergency medical services practitioner as defined by in
R.S. 40:1131, and any.
(c) Any firefighter regularly employed by a fire department of any
municipality, parish, or fire protection district of the state or any volunteer firefighter
of the state.
(2) "Substantial likelihood of transmission" means conduct that includes
contact with blood, semen, or vaginal fluid that carries a significant probability of
HIV transmission according to current and generally accepted medical and scientific
evidence and standards. It does not include conduct that poses a negligible or
theoretical risk of HIV transmission.
E. C.(1) Whoever commits the crime of intentional exposure to HIV violates
the provisions of Paragraph (A)(1), (2), or (3) of this Section shall be fined not more
than five thousand dollars, imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than
ten years, or both.
(2) Whoever commits the crime of intentional exposure to HIV against a first
responder violates the provisions of Paragraph (A)(4) of this Section shall be fined
not more than six thousand dollars, imprisoned with or without hard labor for not
more than eleven years, or both.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 808 ENROLLED
F. D.(1) Any of the following shall be an affirmative defense, if proven by
a preponderance of the evidence, that to a violation of this Section:
(a) That the person exposed to HIV victim knew the infected person
defendant was infected with HIV positive for HIV, knew the action means, contact,
or conduct could result in infection with the transmission of HIV, and gave consent
to the action means, contact, or conduct with that knowledge.
(2) (b) It is also an affirmative defense that That the transfer of bodily fluid,
tissue, or organs blood, semen, or vaginal fluid occurred after advice from a licensed
physician that the accused defendant was noninfectious, and the accused defendant
disclosed his HIV-positive status to the victim.
(3) (c) It is also an affirmative defense that That the HIV-positive person
disclosed defendant either:
(i) Disclosed his HIV-positive status to the victim, and took practical means
to prevent transmission as advised by a physician or other healthcare provider or is.
(ii) Is a healthcare provider who was following professionally accepted
infection control procedures.
(d) That the defendant, at the time of the alleged transmission, disclosed to
the victim that the defendant was receiving medical care for HIV and maintained a
viral load consistent with levels recognized by prevailing medical standards that
effectively eliminated the risk of HIV transmission through sexual contact.
(2) The defendant bears the burden of proof for asserting any affirmative
defense provided in this Subsection.
E. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to criminalize conduct that
poses no medically recognized risk of HIV transmission.
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 726.1 is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 726.1. Notice of medical condition
A. If a defendant intends to introduce documents or testimony relating to a
medical condition or related treatment on the basis of an affirmative defense, he shall
notify the district attorney in writing of such intention and file a copy of the notice
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 808 ENROLLED
with the clerk not later than ten days prior to trial or in a reasonable time as the court
may permit. The court may, for cause shown, allow late filing of the notice or grant
additional time to the parties to prepare for trial or issue any other orders as may be
appropriate. Upon motion of either party, the court shall order that such records be
filed under seal. Nothing in this Article shall be construed to relieve a defendant of
any obligation imposed pursuant to Article 725.
B. If the defendant fails to provide notice as required by Paragraph A of this
Article, the court may exclude the introduction of any documents or testimony of any
witness offered by the defendant on the issue of medical condition or related
treatment.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.